Massachusetts, session 194th, H4531.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 3 of chapter 53 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, a person whose name is not printed on the September 1,
2026 state primary ballot as a candidate for an office, but who receives sufficient votes to
nominate the person for the office, shall file in the office of the state secretary a written
acceptance of the nomination and a receipt from the state ethics commission verifying that a
statement of financial interest has been filed pursuant to chapter 268B of the General Laws not
later than 5:00 P.M. on Thursday, September 3, 2026.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding sections 11, 13 and 53A of chapter 53 of the General Laws
and section 5 of chapter 55B of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the
contrary, objections to and withdrawals from nominations made at the September 1, 2026 state
of 4

primary shall be filed with the state secretary not later than 12:00 P.M. on Friday, September 4,
2026.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding section 14 of chapter 53 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, any vacancies from the September 1, 2026 state primary
caused by death, withdrawal or ineligibility under section 2 shall be filled by an executive
committee, determined by the state party committee, of the same political party who made the
original nomination.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding section 15 of chapter 53 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, when a nomination is made to fill a vacancy caused by the
death, withdrawal or ineligibility of a candidate from the September 1, 2026 state primary, the
certificate of nomination shall be on a form prescribed by the state secretary, shall be signed by
the executive committee appointed by the state committee of the same political party as provided
for in section 3 and shall be filed with the state secretary not later than 5:00 P.M. on Tuesday,
September 8, 2026.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding section 28 of chapter 53 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the state primary in 2026 shall be held on Tuesday,
September 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. (a) Notwithstanding section 135 of chapter 54 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law to the contrary, a petition for a recount of the September 1, 2026
state primary shall be filed with the appropriate local election officials not later than 5:00 P.M.
on Thursday, September 3, 2026 and all recounts shall be completed and notice of the results
shall be sent to the state secretary not later than 5:00 P.M. on Friday, September 11, 2026.
of 4

(b) Petitions for district wide and statewide recounts of the September 1, 2026 state
primary shall be submitted to the appropriate local election officials for certification not later
than 3:00 P.M. on Thursday, September 3, 2026 and local election officials shall complete
certification not later than 12:00 P.M. on Friday, September 4, 2026. Thereafter, certified
petitions shall be filed with the state secretary not later than 5:00 P.M. on Friday, September 4,
2026. If the state secretary determines that the contest is eligible for a statewide or district wide
recount, the state secretary shall notify the local election officials who shall complete the recount
and shall notify the state secretary of the results of the recount not later than 5:00 P.M. on Friday,
September 11, 2026.
(c) Notwithstanding section 135 of chapter 54 of the General Laws, a board of registrars
shall only provide 2 days’ notice of the date, time and location of the recount to each candidate
for the office for which the recount has been petitioned. Electronic notice shall be sufficient.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding sections 8 to 10, inclusive, of chapter 55B of the General
Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the state ballot law commission shall
notify candidates of any objections filed to nominations at the September 1, 2026 state primary
not later than 5:00 P.M. on Friday, September 4, 2026. Notice of the commission hearings shall
be given by telephone and electronic mail. Hearings on objections shall be held on Wednesday,
September 9, 2026 and decisions shall be rendered not later than 5:00 P.M. on Friday, September
11, 2026.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, local election
officials shall transmit absentee ballots to voters covered under the federal Uniformed and
Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1973ff-1 et seq., whose applications were
of 4

received at least 45 days before the November 3, 2026 state election, not later than Saturday,
September 19, 2026.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state
secretary may add or change any dates relating to the nominations made at the September 1,
2026 state primary that the state secretary considers necessary for the orderly administration of
the November 3, 2026 state election by providing notice of the change to the state parties and
any affected person, by filing notice with the publications and regulations division, by posting on
the state secretary’s website and by whatever other means the state secretary considers
appropriate.
of 4